New Jersey, session 222, A1676.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2022, c.49), the annual appropriations act for Fiscal Year 2022-2023, there is appropriated out of the General Fund the following sum for the purpose specified: 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 40 Community Development and Environmental Management 41 Community Development Management STATE AID 06-8015 Uniform Construction Code ................................. $35,000,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Community Development Management ... .. $35,000,000 State Aid: 06 Urban and Rural Centers Unsafe Buildings Demolition Revolving Loan Fund (P.L.1997, c.125) .. ($35,000,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.